Missouri, session 2026, SB1383.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 178.530, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 178.530,
to read as follows:
178.530. 1. The state board of education shall
establish standards and annually inspect, as a basis for
approval, all public prevocational, vocational schools,
State Technical College of Missouri, departments and classes
receiving state or federal moneys for giving training in
agriculture, industrial, home economics and commercial
subjects and all schools, departments and classes receiving
state or federal moneys for the preparation of teachers and
supervisors of such subjects. The public prevocational and
vocational schools, State Technical College of Missouri,
departments, and classes, and the training schools,
departments and classes are entitled to the state or federal
moneys so long as they are approved by the state board of
education, as to site, plant, equipment, qualifications of
teachers, admission of pupils, courses of study and methods
of instruction. All disbursements of state or federal
moneys for the benefit of the approved prevocational and
vocational schools, State Technical College of Missouri,
departments and classes shall be made semiannually. The


school board of each approved school or the governing body
of State Technical College of Missouri shall file a report
with the state board of education at the times and in the
form that the state board requires. Upon receipt of a
satisfactory report, the state board of education shall
certify to the commissioner of administration for [his] the
commissioner's approval the amount of the state and federal
moneys due the school district or State Technical College of
Missouri. The amount due the school district shall be
certified by the commissioner of administration and proper
warrant therefor shall be issued to the district treasurer
or State Technical College of Missouri.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1 of
this section, the state board of education shall establish
standards for agricultural education that may be adopted by
a private school accredited by an agency recognized by the
United States Department of Education as an accreditor of
private schools that wishes to provide quality vocational
programming outside the requirements of, but consistent
with, the federal Vocational Education Act. Such standards
shall be sufficient to qualify a private school to apply to
the state chapter for approval of a local chapter of a
federally chartered national agricultural education
association on a form developed for that purpose by the
department of elementary and secondary education without
eligibility to receive state or federal funding for
agricultural vocational education. The provisions of this
subsection shall not be construed to create eligibility for
a private school to receive state or federal funding for
agricultural vocational education, but shall not prohibit a
private school from receiving state or federal funds for
which such private school would otherwise be eligible for
agricultural vocational education. Any such private school


shall reimburse the department annually for the cost of
oversight and maintenance of the program.
3. (1) The department of elementary and secondary
education, through its agricultural education section, shall
be authorized to establish a [pilot] program, beginning in
the [2020-21] 2027-28 school year, to provide for
agricultural education in elementary schools in the state.
[The purpose of the pilot program shall be to determine
whether and how to implement an elementary agricultural
education program statewide.]
(2) (a) The department, through its employees who
work in the agricultural education section, [is authorized
to select from among applications submitted by the public
elementary schools a minimum of sixteen public elementary
schools for participation in the pilot program. The
department] shall develop [an application] a process for
public elementary schools to [apply to] participate in the
[pilot] program.
(b) The local school board for each elementary school
[selected] that elects to be in the [pilot] program shall
agree to implement and fully fund an elementary agricultural
education program in such school and [to continue to provide
such elementary agricultural education program for a period
no shorter than three years. The local school district] may
employ an agricultural education teacher to provide such
program for the elementary school.
(3) The department, through its employees who work in
the agricultural education section, [and local school
districts] shall [collaborate to] establish [the]
instructional [model] models for [each] the elementary
agricultural education program in conjunction and
collaboration with Missouri agricultural commodity groups
and organizations that promote and support Missouri


agriculture. Such instructional [model] models shall be
grade-appropriate and include instruction in an organized
classroom, collaborative learning experiences through
investigation and inquiry, including laboratory and site-
based learning activities, and personal, leadership, and
career development opportunities.
(4) The department, through its agricultural education
section, shall provide for a program evaluation regarding
the success and impact of the [pilot] program [upon
completion of the third year of the pilot program] and shall
report the results of such evaluation [to the relevant house
and senate committees on agriculture and education] on the
department's website.
4. The department shall maintain an adequate number of
100 full-time employees, certified in agricultural education and
101 distributed regionally throughout the state, to provide
102 accountability for program delivery of agricultural
103 education, to continue to develop and maintain pertinent
104 agricultural education instructional models and standards,
105 to assist local school districts on matters related to
106 agricultural education, and to coordinate regional and
107 statewide activities supporting K-12 agricultural education
108 programming.
109 5. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
110 require public elementary schools to participate in the
111 [pilot] program.
112 6. The requirements of section 160.514 shall not apply
113 to the provisions of this section.